Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3

Committees

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

10-3-101. Presession assignment of regular standing committees.

The presession assignments of members of regular standing Senate and House of Representatives committees and the designation of committee chair and vice chair shall be made in the Senate pursuant to the Rules of the Senate and in the House by the Speaker-elect of the House of Representatives as soon as is feasible after each biennial general election.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 208, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-143; Acts 2001, No. 627, § 1.

10-3-102. Presession meetings.

The Senate and House of Representatives standing committees appointed after the biennial general election as provided in § 10-3-101 are authorized to meet during the months of December and January prior to the convening of the General Assembly for the purpose of taking under consideration prefiled bills assigned to the various committees and for the purpose of holding hearings on those bills. No final committee recommendations shall be made on any bills prefiled and submitted to the various committees until after the General Assembly is convened in session.

Members of Senate and House standing committees attending presession committee meetings as authorized in this section shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage for attending the meetings.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 16, provided:

“Nothing in this act shall affect any statutorily created subcommittee of a joint interim committee.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1973, No. 810, § 4: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in the event it is necessary for the General Assembly to recess for a period in excess of seven calendar days, the members of the House and Senate will incur expenses during such recess for performing the duties of their office and should be allowed reimbursement for such expenses within the limitations prescribed in Act 274 of 1971; that if the General Assembly finds it necessary to recess for a period in excess of thirty days, it is essential that the Legislative Council, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and other interim committees be authorized to conduct their normal business during such recess; and that this act is immediately necessary to permit such committees to meet and to authorize the members of the General Assembly to receive reimbursement for expenses incurred during the recess. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 289, § 2: Mar. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that each session of the General Assembly considers numerous bills proposing amendments, changes, or additions to the publicly supported retirement systems, and that due to the limitations of the time available during each Regular and Special Session, there are not sufficient opportunities to adequately study and review many aspects of the retirement systems that would be affected by such proposed legislation; and that the establishment of a Joint Interim Committee of the General Assembly to serve as an overview committee over the various retirement systems is essential to the proper functioning of the General Assembly; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to establish the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs in order that said committee may enter upon its duties immediately upon adjournment of the Seventieth Session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 50, § 2: Feb. 5, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment and functioning of a sound and adequate system of joint interim committees of the General Assembly is essential to the operation of the legislative department of government, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the Joint Interim Committee on Aging, and Legislative Affairs to commence to perform its duties immediately upon adjournment of the Regular Session of the Seventy-Second General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 97, § 2: Feb. 11, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment and functioning of a sound and adequate system of joint interim committees of the General Assembly is essential to the operation of the legislative department of government, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the Joint Interim Committee on Aging, and Legislative Affairs to commence to perform its duties immediately upon adjournment of the Regular Session of the Seventy-Second General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 310, § 2: Mar. 6, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the rules of the respective houses have been amended to rename their Committee on Economic and Industrial Resources and Development as the Committee on Agriculture, Economic, and Industrial Resources and Development, and that in order that said committees may function as a Joint Interim Committee on Agriculture, Economic, and Industrial Resources and Development, as provided by law, the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order that said Committee may commence functioning immediately upon the adjournment of the 1979 Regular Session. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 709, § 3: Mar. 23, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present name of the Committee on Agriculture, Economic, and Industrial Resources and Development, is unnecessarily long and creates problems on making reference to the committee by name; that the name Agriculture and Economic Development is sufficiently descriptive of the subject matter jurisdiction of the committee; that this act is designed to change the name of the committee to the more appropriate name and should be given effect immediately in order to enable the committee to commence functioning under the new name immediately upon adjournment of the 1983 Regular Session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 273, § 16: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1991, No. 969, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assembly for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 1240, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assembly for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 24: Oct. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to the operation of interim committees of the General Assembly unduly restricts the interim work of the General Assembly by authorizing committees to meet only as joint committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate; that in order to enable the Senate and House of Representatives to efficiently and effectively perform their interim duties, it is necessary that the interim committees of each house be authorized to meet either jointly or separately and that this act should be given effect immediately to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 6: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Arkansas State Police has had ongoing financial difficulty for over twelve (12) years; that the State Police Retirement System has sustained investment losses of approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) within the last two (2) years; that a larger investment pool is needed to help reduce risk and enhance returns; that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has the size and expertise to effectively reduce the volatility of returns, enhance relative returns, and best protect the State Police Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect the members and beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

There has been a phenomenal increase in the volume and complexity of matters affecting state and local government and affecting the citizens of the state, which must be considered and determined by the General Assembly at each session;

The cost of state and local government has increased significantly in the past few years and the General Assembly has the primary responsibility for allocating state revenues to the various agencies, departments, and programs of state government as well as to the various political subdivisions and school districts within the state;

It is not possible during the limited legislative sessions for the members of the General Assembly to make the detailed studies and investigations and to give the very important matters coming before it the necessary consideration and deliberation that is essential for it to make decisions in the best interests of this state and its citizens;

The great increase in the number, complexity, and magnitude of federal programs and projects which must be administered primarily at the state and local level, together with the unprecedented growth and increase in state programs, projects, and services, and the necessary increases in revenues of the state which provide support for these programs, make it necessary that the General Assembly and the members thereof spend a great deal more time in becoming familiar with the various programs, projects, and services in order that they may properly represent their constituents in those matters when they come before the General Assembly; and

In order for the members of the General Assembly to carry out their primary responsibility of making decisions in behalf of the citizens of this state regarding the many expensive but worthwhile programs, projects, and services, and regarding the allocation of revenues to finance the more essential programs, projects, and services and to wisely enact and revise both civil and criminal laws applicable in this state, it is necessary that a system of interim committees of the General Assembly be established whereby the individual members of the House of Representatives and Senate will have an opportunity during the interim between sessions to study and analyze the many problems which will face them at the next session of the General Assembly in order that they will have a proper basis for casting their vote on those matters when the occasion arises.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 208, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-144.

Subchapter 2

— Interim Committees Generally

10-3-201. Legislative findings.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

The General Assembly further finds that:

It is essential to a proper and efficient legislative system that adequate professional and clerical assistance and facilities be provided the interim committees of the General Assembly during the interim between sessions in order to facilitate and coordinate the efforts of the various interim committees; and

To accomplish this purpose, it is essential that the services and facilities available to the General Assembly be properly coordinated and organized in order to avoid duplication of effort and inefficiency in the legislative department.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1001n.

10-3-202. Purpose and intent.

It is the purpose and intent of §§10-3-201 —10-3-208,10-3-212 —10-3-214, and10-3-216 to provide for the necessary interim activities of the General Assembly in order that the members of the General Assembly may become better informed in matters coming before the General Assembly, to assure greater participation by all members of the General Assembly in the study of the many complex problems which face the General Assembly each session, and to provide the General Assembly with the essential staff and facilities to effectively carry out its responsibility as representatives of the citizens of this state.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1001n.